Utah statutes.
78B-3-909.   Report to Legislature -- Repeal date.

(1)  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall present a report to the Judiciary Interim Committee not later than September 2016 regarding the program.  The report shall include:

(a)  the number of expedited jury trials held;

(b)  the number of appeals from expedited jury trials;

(c)  the approximate cost increase or cost savings experienced by using expedited jury trials; and

(d)  a recommendation to continue or sunset this part.

(2)  This part is repealed January 1, 2017.

